Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Eligibility for Appointment as District Attorney Emeritus

47-12-60.
Eligibility for retirement from the office of district attorney and appointment to the office of district attorney emeritus.

Except as otherwise provided by general law, any person who is in at least his or her nineteenth year of service as district attorney of this state or as both a solicitor of a city court from which appeals can be taken directly to the Court of Appeals and as district attorney shall be eligible for retirement as district attorney and appointment to the office of district attorney emeritus. In computing years of service under this Code section, a person may be given credit for service as assistant district attorney or as an assistant to the district attorney if in the course of such service he or she performed the duties of the district attorney in the prosecution of cases in both the superior court and the city court, provided that such service was rendered immediately prior to his or her appointment or election as district attorney.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 2; Ga. L. 1950, p. 177, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 597, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1632, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 8.

47-12-61.
Credit for service rendered as a judge of a city court from which appeals can be taken directly to the Court of Appeals; payments required in order to obtain such credit.

In computing years of service as a district attorney for any purpose under this chapter, any time served by a district attorney as a judge of any city court from which appeals can be taken directly to the Court of Appeals of Georgia may be counted in computing the required number of years of service, provided that he pays into the fund the maximum payment provided for by this chapter for each year of service actually served as such a judge, plus interest on each such payment at the rate of 6 percent per annum. Such payment shall be made within six months after March 7, 1966, or within six months after taking office as a district attorney, whichever is later. A district attorney who claims credit for such service shall not be entitled to any retirement benefits under this chapter until he has reached the age of 60 years, provided that this limitation shall not otherwise affect his eligibility to become a district attorney emeritus prior to reaching the age of 60.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 210, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-12-62.
Credit for service rendered as a judge of a county court from which appeals can be taken directly to the Court of Appeals; payments required in order to obtain such credit.

In computing years of service as a district attorney for any purpose under this chapter, any time served by a district attorney as a judge of any county court from which appeals can be taken directly to the Court of Appeals of Georgia may be counted in computing the number of years of service required of any district attorney, provided that he pays into the fund the maximum payment provided for by this chapter for each year of service actually served as such a judge, plus interest on such payment at the rate of 6 percent per annum. Such payment shall be made by not later than January 1, 1975.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1246, § 1.

47-12-63.
Credit for service rendered as a member of the General Assembly or as an attorney for the state or an authority thereof; payments required in order to obtain such credit.

In computing years of service as a district attorney for any purpose under this chapter, up to three years of service as a member of the General Assembly and any time served as an attorney for the state or any authority thereof on a salary basis may be counted in computing the number of years of service required of a district attorney, provided that he pays into the fund the maximum payment provided for by this chapter for each year of such service as a member of the General Assembly, and any time served as an attorney for the state or any authority thereof on a salary basis, plus interest on such payment at the rate of 6 percent per annum. Such payment shall be made on or before June 30, 1974. In computing such credit, any such district attorney shall be credited for a full year for each year of membership in the General Assembly and a full year for each year he served as an attorney for the state or any authority thereof on a salary basis.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 220, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1180, § 1.

47-12-64.
Credit for service in the armed forces of the United States during certain national emergencies; payments required in order to obtain such credit.

In computing years of service as a district attorney, credit shall be given for services in the armed forces of the United States occasioned by only one of the following national emergencies: World War I, World War II, or the Korean Conflict. Such credit shall be given upon payment into the fund of the maximum payments provided under Code Section 47-12-41 for each year or fraction of a year of such service in the armed forces, together with 6 percent simple interest on such amount for each year from the beginning of his service as a district attorney until the date such contributions are paid into the fund. The district attorney shall receive a credit of one year for each year or fraction of year of such service for which contribution into the fund has been made. Such payment shall be made no later than January 1, 1976.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 163, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1632, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.